New York, session 2025-2026, A772.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Justin Finkle, who is a resident of the town of Bethlehem, in 5 the county of Albany, shall be eligible to take the competitive civil 6 service examination for the position of police officer and shall, 7 contingent upon his score on such examination, be eligible to be placed 8 on the eligible list for appointment as a full-time police officer with 9 the Bethlehem police department in the town of Bethlehem, county of 10 Albany. 11 § 2. Justin Finkle shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 12 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 13 cers. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00026-01-5